Washington statutes.
RCW 4.14.030

Orders and process upon removal—Remand of cases improvidently removed.

In any case removed from justice court under the provisions of this chapter, the superior court may issue all necessary orders and process to bring before it all proper parties whether served by process issued by the justice court or otherwise.

If at any time before final judgment it appears that the case was removed improvidently and without jurisdiction, the superior court shall remand the case, and may order the payment of just costs. A certified copy of the order of remand shall be mailed by the clerk of the superior court to the justice court. The justice court may thereupon proceed with such case.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 46 s 6.]